Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-617
Violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association violating any of the provisions of sections 12-603 and 12-606 to 12-618 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 18, § 12, p. 149;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 74.